Hawaii statutes.
§576B-503 Employer's compliance with
two or more income withholding orders. If an obligor's employer receives two
or more income withholding orders with respect to the earnings of the same
obligor, the employer satisfies the terms of the orders if the employer
complies with the law of the state of the obligor's principal place of
employment to establish the priorities for withholding and allocating income
withheld for two or more child support obligees. [L 1997, c 295, pt of §1; am L
2015, c 77, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next